Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.010

Intent.

The legislature intends to:

(1) Authorize and establish a new licensing and regulatory program for hemp production in this state in accordance with the agriculture improvement act of 2018;

(2) Replace the industrial hemp research program in *chapter 15.120 RCW, with the new licensing and regulatory program established in this chapter, and enable hemp growers licensed under the industrial hemp research program on the effective date of rules implementing this chapter and regulating hemp production, to transfer into the program created in this chapter; and

(3) Authorize the growing of hemp as a legal, agricultural activity in this state. Hemp is an agricultural product that may be legally grown, produced, processed, possessed, transferred, commercially sold, and traded. Hemp and processed hemp produced in accordance with this chapter or produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country may be transferred and sold within the state, outside of this state, and internationally. Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent or restrain commerce in this state involving hemp or hemp products produced lawfully under the laws of another state, tribe, or country.

[ 2019 c 158 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 15.120 RCW was repealed by 2019 c 158 s 15.